epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/ga.xml
		teá6
		t1eái
		t1eál
		teám5
		1tei
		t1eo
		5t4eoc
		téach6
		téacht5
		téal2
		téa3la
		téar5t6
		4téig
		té6igh
		4t3éirs
		t4éit
		2t1f
		t1g
		t2h
		4th.
		t6ha
		6thab
		thach6t5
		thagh4
		thaghd3
		thair4b
		thairbh5
		thair6g
		thair6is.
		thair4n
		thairn5e
		thaist5
		th5am.
		than3g
		than2t3
		tha6p5
		tharc6
		thar5g6
		thar3n4
		5tharr
		thar5t6a
		tháin5
		tháir5t
		t4he
		thead5as
		thea3la
		theas4t5
		6theá
		th5eán
		t6hé
		théach6
		théacht5
		théal2
		théa3la
		thé3if
		th1f
		th5in.
		thin6i
		thit3e
		thí6f5
		thío5t
		th6ís
		th1l
		thlua5da
		th5nó
		5thoin6
		thoir4n3
		3thon
		thor4c
		thor5pá
		thost5
		thóch5
		5thógt
		thóir6se
		thóir6sí
		thós4
		thrá5b
		thrá5inn
		thrí3oc
		thros6
		4ths
		thua5da
		thua5im
		thua5itea
		thuar5
		5thuig
		3thur
		thu5sa
		6ti.
		tia5g
		6t5iam
		t1ib2
		tib5é
		tib6éar
		ti1bi
		t1id4
		ti3dé
		ti3di
		ti3f4
		t1ig
		5t6ige
		t3ileo
		t3ilí
		4tilít
		t5ilt
		4t3i1m4é
		ti5míne
		ti5míni
		tin6d5
		t3inea
		t3ini
		t3iní
		tin5t4
		tipi5c6
		tir4i
		tis3
		t3ist6
		tit5ea
		tit5eá
		6t5iteo
		ti5té
		ti3tiú
		t1iú.
		t3iúl
		3tiún
		t1í
		tí4f3
		tíg5
		3t2íl1
		5t6íol
		5tíop
		5tíor
		tío5t6
		3t4íp
		5tír
		6t5íteas
		6t5íti
		2t1l
		t1m
		tm4a
		tm6e
		tm6i
		2t1n2
		t5ne
		t5ní
		tod5ó
		tof5
		6toid
		toin6
		toir2n3
		tom6a
		tor2c
		torch3
		tor3p
		tort5a
		tos6t3
		tóch5
		t1óf
		3tóip
		tóir6se
		tóir6sí
		3tól
		3tóp
		1tós4
		tra6bó
		trac6
		6tra5cá
		trai6m5
		4traip
		6traláib
		t3rar
		trá5b
		trá5inn
		t6ráis
		t4rát
		tream4
		trea3ma
		triach6
		tri3ghn
		trí1r
		tros6
		trost5
		3tróp
		t4ru
		truac4
		trua3cá
		tr6ú
		t6rús
		ts2
		t5sa
		t6sai
		tsa6l
		tsal5a
		tsal6v5
		t1s4ea
		t6sean
		tsearbh5
		t3seo
		t3si
		tsi6m5
		tsiún6
		tsiúnt5
		t1sí
		t3su
		t3sú
		tua5da
		tua5itea
		tuar5
		tuis3
		tuío3
		tur3b
		tur3n4
		t5úid
		tú3m6
		3tús3
		t3vi
		uabh6r
		ua3chl
		uad3á
		ua1f2
		ua6fa.
		6uaid
		ua3idí
		uai5g6é
		ua3igí.
		ua3imid
		ua3imis
		ua3inn.
		uains6
		uain5t4
		uair3c4í
		uairn6
		uair5tí
		uais1
		uaist2
		ua3iteá
		uaith6i5s
		ua3ití.
		uait5s
		uala5t
		ualath6
		ual3g4
		ua3lu
		ua3mar
		uamh6ar
		ua3mhé
		uana5l6
		5uanla
		ua5nós
		uar3g4
		uart4
		uar5tai
		uar5taí.
		uar5tan
		ub1a
		ub5á
		ubh1
		uc1a
		uch1a
		uch3á
		uch3ó
		uch3r
		uc5l
		uc3r
		uc3s
		uc5ú
		ud1
		uf1
		uga5dá
		ug3l
		uic6i5s
		uid1
		uifé5
		6uig3
		uil3p
		ui4m
		uim3p
		uin5c
		uins3iú
		uin3t4
		uint5í
		uin6tín
		ui6p5
		uir5b4
		uirbh6
		uir3c4í
		4uire
		uirn6
		6uirs
		uirs3t
		uir3t
		uirt4í
		ui6s
		uis3cr
		uis5t
		uit3é
		uit3s
		uí3b
		uí3d
		uí1g
		uí5l6e
		uí1m
		uí1od
		uío3dó
		uí3oma
		uí3onn
		uí3ó
		uí5teá
		uíth6
		uí5tí
		ul1a
		ul3á
		ul3g4
		ul3m4
		ul3ó
		ul5p6
		ul6t5as
		ul4tr
		um1a
		umh1
		ump1
		un5a
		un3á
		unc1a
		un5e
		ung1
		un5ga3l
		un3g4ar
		un5gá
		un3o
		un1ó
		un6sa.
		un6s5aí
		un3ú
		unúd4
		uó3t6
		up1
		4ur1a
		urach3
		ur6ag
		ur3á
		urca3m4
		urch4
		ur3d6ú
		urg5ói
		ur5gón
		ur3i
		ur6l3ál
		ur3m4
		6urn
		ur3ó
		ur3p
		urscar6
		urscart5
		ur3t4
		ur5u
		ur3ú
		6us.
		usc5ai
		usc3l
		us3cr
		ust5ac
		ust5ail
		us4t3al
		us3tó
		us5tu
		ust5ún
		ut5a
		u6t5á
		ut3e
		uth1
		uthan5t
		ut3ó
		uz3a
		ú5an
		ú1á
		ú4áil.
		úb1
		úba5dá
		úbail4
		úb4h
		úbh5a
		úc1a
		úca3b
		úcas4t
		úch1a
		ú1ch2á
		ú3che
		ú3chí
		úch5l
		úch5óg
		ú5chr
		úcht4ó
		úc1l
		úc1ó
		úc1r
		úc4rá
		úd1
		ú6dó
		úd5r
		úd5ú
		ú1f
		ú6fó
		ú1gh
		úg1r
		4úid
		ú3idís
		ú3igí
		6úile
		6úili
		úil4t3
		ú3imi
		úint4
		úirt3
		úir2té
		úisc3
		úis3c4é
		ú5itear
		ú3iteá.
		úithi5s
		ú6itín
		úits3eá
		úl1
		ú3l4ag
		ú4l5agá
		úlc4
		ú5l6e
		úl6éim
		ú3l4i
		6úlr
		últ4
		ú3l4ua
		úl5ú
		úlú5l
		ú1mh
		úmh3ac
		ú4mhn
		ú4mh3ú
		ún5a
		ún3á
		úng5á
		úng5u
		6únl
		4ú1nn
		ún3o
		ún1ó
		ún3t2
		úp1
		ú6p5a
		úpa5t6
		ú5p6r
		úr1
		úra3b
		úrabh4
		úra3dá
		úran6
		úr6ana
		úr5ó
		úrt4
		ú3r6u
		úr4ú
		ú5rúi
		ús4air
		ús2á
		ús5án
		úsc1
		ú4sh3l
		ú3s4m
		ús3ó
		ú3s4pé
		ú3sto
		úst3ó
		ús6t3r
		ús3ú
		út3a
		ú6t1á
		úth1
		ú3tho
		út5óg
		út1r
		ú5úi
		ú5úl
		v1a
		vach6
		vac3s4
		v4ad
		vais5
		vaisc6
		var5
		vard6
		3v4at
		v1á
		vean6
		veant5
		vear3
		vearn6
		3v4ei
		veil5b
		v3eo
		véar6
		véis5
		véist6
		5v6ial
		3v4ini
		vios5
		vir5
		virg6
		v6íc
		v3la
		3vol4
		volt3
		vuít5
		x3ac
		x5ai
		x5aí
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
